Utah statutes.
70A-7a-105.   Reissuance in alternative medium.
(1)  Upon request of a person entitled under an electronic document of title,
the issuer of the electronic document may issue a tangible document of title
as a substitute for the electronic document if:
(a)  the person entitled under the electronic document surrenders control of
the document to the issuer; and
(b)  the tangible document when issued contains a statement that it is issued
in substitution for the electronic document.
(2)  Upon issuance of a tangible document of title in substitution for an
electronic document of title in accordance with Subsection (1):
(a)  the electronic document ceases to have any effect or validity; and
(b)  the person that procured issuance of the tangible document warrants to
all subsequent persons entitled under the tangible document that the warrantor
was a person entitled under the electronic document when the warrantor
surrendered control of the electronic document to the issuer.
(3)  Upon request of a person entitled under a tangible document of title, the
issuer of the tangible document may issue an electronic document of title as a
substitute for the tangible document if:
(a)  the person entitled under the tangible document surrenders possession of
the document to the issuer; and
(b)  the electronic document when issued contains a statement that it is
issued in substitution for the tangible document.
(4)  Upon issuance of an electronic document of title in substitution for a
tangible document of title in accordance with Subsection (3):
(a)  the tangible document ceases to have any effect or validity; and
(b)  the person that procured issuance of the electronic document warrants to
all subsequent persons entitled under the electronic document that the
warrantor was a person entitled under the tangible document when the warrantor
surrendered possession of the tangible document to the issuer.
